District of Columbia statutes.
16-506

Traversing affidavits; quashing writ of attachment; trial of issues.

If the defendant files affidavits traversing the affidavits filed by the plaintiff the court shall determine whether the facts set forth in the plaintiff’s affidavits as ground for issuing the attachment are true, and whether there was just ground for issuing the attachment. When, in the opinion of the court, the proofs do not sustain the affidavit of the plaintiff, his agent, or attorney, the court shall quash the writ of attachment. This issue may be tried by the court or a judge at chambers after three days’ notice. The issue may be tried as well upon oral testimony as upon affidavits. If the court deems it expedient, a jury may be impaneled to try the issue.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 545, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-529.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-506.
1973 Ed., § 16-506.